Washington statutes.
RCW 41.72.020

Law enforcement medal of honor committee established—Membership—Establishment of qualifications for award.

There is created the state law enforcement medal of honor committee for nominating candidates for the award of the state law enforcement medal of honor. The committee membership consists of a representative from the governor's office, the Washington state law enforcement association, the Washington state council of police officers, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington state troopers association. The attorney general shall serve as chair of the committee and shall designate a secretary for the committee. The committee shall meet not less than semiannually to consider candidates for nomination. The committee shall adopt rules establishing the qualifications for the state law enforcement medal of honor, the protocol governing the decoration, and the appurtenances necessary to the implementation of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 89 s 2.]